Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 4. Cosmetics.

Sec. 17.20.140.
Adulterated cosmetics.

A cosmetic is adulterated if

it bears or contains a poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to a user under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement of it, or under conditions of use which are customary or usual; however, this provision does not apply to coal tar hair dye, the label of which bears the following legend conspicuously displayed: “Caution — this product contains ingredients which may cause skin irritation on certain individuals and a preliminary test according to accompanying directions should first be made. This product must not be used for dyeing the eyelashes or eyebrows; to do so may cause blindness.” and the labeling of which bears adequate directions for preliminary testing, and for the purposes of this paragraph and (5) of this section the term “hair dye” does not include eyelash dyes or eyebrow dyes;

it consists in whole or in part of a filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance;

it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions by which it may have become contaminated with filth or made injurious to health;

its container is composed, in whole or in part, of a poisonous or deleterious substance which may make the contents injurious to health;

it is not a hair dye and it bears or contains a coal tar color other than one from a batch which has been certified under authority of the federal act.

History.

(§ 18 ch 129 SLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

Liability of seller of cosmetics for injuries on theory of breach of warranty as affected by buyer’s or user’s allergy or unusual susceptibility to injury from article. 26 ALR2d 968.

Sufficiency of evidence to support product misuse defense in products liability action concerning cosmetics and other personal care products. 58 ALR4th 40.

Sec. 17.20.150.
Misbranded cosmetics.

A cosmetic is misbranded if

its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

it is in package form unless it bears a label containing (A) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (B) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; however, under (B) of this paragraph reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by regulations adopted by the department;

a word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on it with conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in terms which make it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

its container is made, formed, or filled so as to be misleading.

History.

(§ 19 ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.152.
Enforcement authority.

The commissioner of environmental conservation is responsible for enforcing AS

17.20.140

—

17.20.155

, and may delegate that authority as appropriate.
This section does not limit the authority of peace officers.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981))

Sec. 17.20.155.
Definition.

In AS

17.20.140

—

17.20.155

, “department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981))